Utah statutes.
63G-2-107.   Disclosure of records subject to federal law.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsections 63G-2-201(6)(a) and (b), this
chapter does not apply to a record containing protected health information as
defined in 45 C.F.R., Part 164, Standards for Privacy of Individually
Identifiable Health Information, if the record is:
(1)  controlled or maintained by a governmental entity; and
(2)  governed by 45 C.F.R., Parts 160 and 164, Standards for Privacy of
Individually Identifiable Health Information.
